trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/be/hunspell/be_BY.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4944 Y 1
SFX 4944 у чалі у
SFX 3113 Y 1
SFX 3113 е іць е
SFX 2295 Y 1
SFX 2295 й льніца й
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 ц чалі ц
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 а ьшчыку а
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 ы эўшай ы
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 ю яе ю
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 ю яй ю
SFX 2749 Y 1
SFX 2749 ы інах ы
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 ю ёмся ю
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 е ла е
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 й ла й
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 к ла к
SFX 659 Y 1
SFX 659 а ьнікаў а
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 м уючых м
SFX 1061 Y 1
SFX 1061 а оваму а
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 е уўшая е
SFX 3694 Y 1
SFX 3694 й чыце й
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 ы ікамі ы
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 ы іцам ы
SFX 3829 Y 1
SFX 3829 е оваму е
SFX 3656 Y 1
SFX 3656 а ніку а
SFX 3640 Y 1
SFX 3640 й чнае й
SFX 3639 Y 1
SFX 3639 й чнай й
SFX 4823 Y 1
SFX 4823 у энняў у
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 к чнай к
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 к чнае к
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 ю яўшага ю
SFX 4304 Y 1
SFX 4304 м чнае м
SFX 4302 Y 1
SFX 4302 м чнай м
SFX 4516 Y 1
SFX 4516 т ціўшы т
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 е каму е
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 е ца е
SFX 4493 Y 1
SFX 4493 а енні а
SFX 3542 Y 1
SFX 3542 т цім т
SFX 1521 Y 1
SFX 1521 ы інаю ы
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 е ік е
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 к чкі к
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 й тых й
SFX 3864 Y 1
SFX 3864 ы энняў ы
SFX 4948 Y 1
SFX 4948 к ца к
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 а ьшчыкамі а
SFX 4887 Y 1
SFX 4887 а лівым а
SFX 4321 Y 1
SFX 4321 м стым м
